Utah statutes.
53B-2a-108.   Campus boards of directors -- Membership -- Appointments.

A campus shall have a campus board of directors appointed as follows:

(1)  the Bridgerland Applied Technology College Campus Board of Directors shall be composed of the following 12 members:

(a)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Box Elder School District;

(b)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Cache School District;

(c)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Logan School District;

(d)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Rich School District;

(e)  one member of the Utah State University board of trustees; and

(f)  seven representatives of business or industry employers within the region appointed jointly by the members appointed under Subsections (1)(a) through (e);

(2)  the Ogden-Weber Applied Technology College Campus Board of Directors shall be composed of the following 10 members:

(a)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Ogden City School District;

(b)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Weber School District;

(c)  one elected local school board member jointly appointed by the boards of education for the Ogden City School District and the Weber School District;

(d)  one member of the Weber State University board of trustees; and

(e)  six representatives of business or industry employers within the region appointed jointly by the members appointed under Subsections (2)(a) through (d);

(3)  the Davis Applied Technology College Campus Board of Directors shall be composed of the following 10 members:

(a)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Davis School District;

(b)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Morgan School District;

(c)  one elected local school board member jointly appointed by the boards of education for the Davis School District and the Morgan School District;

(d)  one member of the Weber State University board of trustees; and

(e)  six representatives of business or industry employers within the region appointed jointly by the members appointed under Subsections (3)(a) through (d);

(4)  the Tooele Applied Technology College Campus Board of Directors shall be composed of the following 12 members:

(a)  three elected local school board members appointed by the board of education for the Tooele County School District;

(b)  one member of the Salt Lake Community College board of trustees;

(c)  one member of the Utah State University board of trustees; and

(d)  seven representatives of business or industry employers within the region appointed jointly by the members appointed under Subsections (4)(a) through (c);

(5)  the Mountainland Applied Technology College Campus Board of Directors shall be composed of the following 18 members:

(a)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Alpine School District;

(b)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Nebo School District;

(c)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Provo School District;

(d)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the South Summit School District;

(e)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the North Summit School District;

(f)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Wasatch School District;

(g)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Park City School District;

(h)  one member of the Utah Valley University board of trustees; and

(i)  10 representatives of business or industry employers within the region appointed jointly by the members appointed under Subsections (5)(a) through (h);

(6)  the Uintah Basin Applied Technology College Campus Board of Directors shall be composed of the following 10 members:

(a)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Daggett School District;

(b)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Duchesne School District;

(c)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Uintah School District;

(d)  one member of the Utah State University board of trustees; and

(e)  six representatives of business or industry employers within the region appointed jointly by the members appointed under Subsections (6)(a) through (d);

(7)  the Southwest Applied Technology College Campus Board of Directors shall be composed of the following 12 members:

(a)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Beaver School District;

(b)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Garfield School District;

(c)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Iron School District;

(d)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Kane School District;

(e)  one member of the Southern Utah University board of trustees; and

(f)  seven representatives of business or industry employers within the region appointed jointly by the members appointed under Subsections (7)(a) through (e);

(8)  the Dixie Applied Technology College Campus Board of Directors shall be composed of the following 10 members:

(a)  three elected local school board members appointed by the board of education for the Washington School District;

(b)  one member of the Dixie State University board of trustees; and

(c)  six representatives of business or industry employers within the region appointed jointly by the members appointed under Subsections (8)(a) through (b); and

(9)  the representatives of business or industry employers shall be:

(a)  appointed jointly by the designated members from a list of names provided by local organizations or associations whose members employ workers with career and technical education;

(b)  individuals recognized for their knowledge and expertise;

(c)  individuals who represent current and emerging business and industry sectors of the state; and

(d)  appointed on a nonpartisan basis.



Amended by Chapter 10, 2013 General Session

